Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4630
Power to contract: Power of appointment not presently exercisable.

A powerholder of a power of appointment that is not presently exercisable may contract to exercise or not to exercise the power only if the powerholder:

(1) is also the donor of the power; and

(2) has reserved the power in a revocable trust.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 53.